South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S275.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 58-27-10 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (12) "Direct current fast charging station" means an electric vehicle charging system capable of delivering electricity at a minimum of fifty kilowatts or greater direct current to an electric vehicle's rechargeable battery at a voltage of two hundred volts or greater and is separate and distinct from make-ready infrastructure. (13) "Electric vehicle" means a motor vehicle that is propelled by one or more electric motors using energy stored in the form of a rechargeable battery. (14) "Electric vehicle charging provider" means the owner of an electric vehicle charging station. SECTION 2.  Section 58-27-1060 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 58-27-1060.  (A) A person or corporation who uses an electric vehicle charging station to resell electricity to the public for compensation is not an electric utility if: (1) the person or corporation has procured the electricity from an electrical utility, a municipality, a consolidated political subdivision, the Public Service Authority, or an electric cooperative that is authorized to engage in the retail sale of electricity within the territory in which the electric vehicle charging service is provided; (2) the person or corporation furnishes electricity exclusively for the charging of plug-in electric vehicles;  and (3) the charging station is immobile. (B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of an electrical utility, a municipality, a consolidated political subdivision, the Public Service Authority, or an electric cooperative to use provide and appropriately charge for the make-ready infrastructure required to serve the electrical load of electric vehicle charging stations to furnish electricity to electric vehicle charging providers for charging electric vehicles, or to utilize any state or federal grant funding.  Any increases in customer demand or energy consumption associated with transportation electrification shall not constitute found revenues for an electrical utility. (C) An electrical utility, a municipality, a consolidated political subdivision, the Public Service Authority, or an electric cooperative that provides, owns, operates, or maintains a direct-current- fast charging station for direct public use shall offer fair, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory rates and services to all entities providing similar services and shall not act in a manner that provides an unreasonable advantage for its direct current fast charging stations. (D) Revenue from services other than direct current fast charging stations direct current fast charging stations owned or operated by such entities Revenue received by an electrical utility, a municipality, a consolidated political subdivision, the Public Service Authority, or an electric cooperative or its subsidiary or affiliate from electric services other than direct-current-fast charging stations, shall not, directly or indirectly, subsidize investments in direct current fast charging stations owned or operated by such entities. (E) Nothing in subsection (C) or (D) shall be construed to apply to a direct-current-fast charging station that was constructed, provided by, owned, operated, or maintained by an electrical utility, a municipality, a consolidated political subdivision, the Public Service Authority, or an electric cooperative prior to the effective date of this act. (F) Nothing in subsection (D) shall be construed to apply to a direct current-fast-charging stations that are not public facing and located on the premises of an electrical utility, a municipality, a consolidated political subdivision, the Public Service Authority, or an electric cooperative for the sole purpose of serving its own electric vehicles or electric vehicles owned by its employees. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----